src-fst-morphology-affixes-propernouns.lexc.md
# SKOLT SAAMI PROPERNOUN MORPHOLOGY 

THE LEXICON *`OUTSIDE_LEXICONS`* ASSIGNS THE TAG +Attr

* LEXICON PROP_1Â_VCC  papp:pa%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}pp

* LEXICON PROP_1Â_VKK_VVGG  jokk:jo%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}kk

* LEXICON PROP_TOP_1Â_VYXX  põrtt:põ%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}rtt
* LEXICON PROP_1Â_VYXX   põrtt:põ%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}rtt
* LEXICON PROP_TOP_1Â_VYKK  algg:a%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}lgg
* LEXICON PROP_1Â_VYKK  algg:a%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}lgg
* LEXICON PROP_1Â_VWYKK  algg:a%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}lgg

* LEXICON PROP_1Â_VUKK  joukk:jo%^1VOWu%{ʹØ%}kk
* LEXICON PROP_1Â_VUCC  autt:a%^1VOWu%{ʹØ%}tt
muõrr
Ruõšš:Ruõ%{ʹØ%}šˈš

* LEXICON PROP_1E_VVQCC  sääʹmm:sää%{ʹØ%}mm

* LEXICON PROP_1Â_VVC  plaan:plaa%{ʹØ%}n

* LEXICON PROP_FEDD  Fedd:Fẹ%^1VOWdd

* LEXICON PROP_TOP_1E_VUQKK   päiʹǩǩ:pä%^1VOWi%{ʹØ%}kk
* LEXICON PROP_1E_VUQCC   jäuʹrr:jä%^1VOWu%{ʹØ%}rr

* LEXICON PROP_TOP_1E_VQKK  čåʹǩǩ:čå%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}kk
* LEXICON PROP_1E_VQKK  čåʹǩǩ:čå%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}kk
* LEXICON PROP_1E_VQCC  väʹll:vä%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}ll

* LEXICON PROP_TOOBDYLM_mal  toobdâlm:toobdâlm

like KÕÕNJÂL 
## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 167)
## 1.1 Sg.Loc in -âst (no vowel shift, all raised)
â-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.1.1 Sg.Ill vowel	-e
## 1.1.1.1 Has Palatalization
## 1.1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
Palatalized: Sg.Ill
Not Palatalized: ELSE
Sg.Ill in palatalization and -e
## 1.1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.1.1.1[1].1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.1.1.1[1].1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant and Consonant Geminate alternation)
Extra strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
## FORMS
* Yaml: **N-kidd, N-soll, N-toll, N-vorr**
strong_geminate, short_vowel, no_palatalization, high_stem_vowel 
:%>â ESS ;    		  = * LEXICON PROP_TOOBDYLM_mal  tollân
strong_geminate, short_vowel, palatalization, high_stem_vowel
single_consonant, long_vowel, no_palatalization, high_stem_vowel
:%^V2VV%^CC2C SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;	= * LEXICON PROP_TOOBDYLM_mal  tool
:%^V2VV%^CC2C SG-COM_IN ;               = * LEXICON PROP_TOOBDYLM_mal  toolin
:%^V2VV%^CC2C PL-OBL ;	                = * LEXICON PROP_TOOBDYLM_mal  tooli, toolid, toolid, toolin, toolivuiʹm, toolitaa

## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 167)
## 1.1 Sg.Loc in -âst (no vowel shift, all raised)
â-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.1.1 Sg.Ill vowel	-e
## 1.1.1.1 Has Palatalization
## 1.1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
Palatalized: Sg.Ill
Not Palatalized: ELSE
Sg.Ill in palatalization and -e
## 1.1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.1.1.1[1].1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.1.1.1[1].1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant and Consonant Geminate alternation)
Extra strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
## FORMS
* Yaml: **N-kuss**

R ;		= * LEXICON PROP_TOOBDYLM_mal  kuss
:%>â ESS ;     		 = * LEXICON PROP_TOOBDYLM_mal  kussân

* LEXICON PROP_VUYSPPOAQD  vuâsppåʹd:vuâsppå%^1VOWd

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-sms/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc)</small>
